District of Columbia statutes.
22-1706

Three-card monte and confidence games.

Whoever shall in the District deal, play, or practice, or be in any manner accessory to the dealing or practicing, of the confidence game or swindle known as 3-card monte, or of any such game, play, or practice, or any other confidence game, play, or practice, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 and by imprisonment for not more than 180 days.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1331, ch. 854, § 867
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(j), 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(r), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Fraud, see § 22-3221.
Search warrants, see § 23-521 et seq.
Theft, see § 22-3211.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1506.
1973 Ed., § 22-1506.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not exceeding $1,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(j) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(r) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.